Utah statutes.
63F-1-604.   Duties of the division.

The division shall:

(1)  be responsible for providing support to executive branch agencies for an agency's information technology assets and functions that are unique to the executive branch agency and are mission critical functions of the agency;

(2)  conduct audits of an executive branch agency when requested under the provisions of Section 63F-1-208;

(3)  conduct cost-benefit analysis of delegating a department function to an agency in accordance with Section 63F-1-208;

(4)  provide in-house information technology staff support to executive branch agencies;

(5)  establish accountability and performance measures for the division to assure that the division is meeting the business and service needs of the state and individual executive branch agencies;

(6)  establish a committee composed of agency user groups for the purpose of coordinating department services with agency needs;

(7)  assist executive branch agencies in complying with the requirements of any rule adopted by the chief information officer; and

(8)  by July 1, 2006 and each July 1 thereafter, report to the Public Utilities and Technology Interim Committee on the performance measures used by the division under Subsection (5) and the results.



Amended by Chapter 270, 2011 General Session

